Washington statutes.
RCW 7.56.060

Judgment.

In every case wherein the right to an office is contested, judgment shall be rendered upon the rights of the parties, and for the damages the relator may show himself or herself entitled to, if any, at the time of the judgment.

[ 2011 c 336 s 239; Code 1881 s 707; 1877 p 144 s 711; 1854 p 217 s 473; RRS s 1039.]